Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.245

Facilities and rights-of-way—Requirements and restrictions—Application to code cities.

Each code city is subject to the requirements and restrictions regarding facilities and rights-of-way under *this chapter.

[ 2000 c 83 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: A reference to chapter 35.99 RCW was apparently intended.

"Facilities," "right-of-way" defined: RCW 35.99.010.